Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.220

Limitation on certain cash dividends within ten years of conversion.

Except as provided in RCW 32.32.222, no converted savings bank may, without the prior approval of the director, for a period of ten years after the date of its conversion, declare or pay a cash dividend on its capital stock in an amount in excess of one-half of the greater of:

(1) The savings bank's net income for the current fiscal year; or

(2) The average of the savings bank's net income for the current fiscal year and not more than two of the immediately preceding fiscal years.

For purposes of this chapter, "net income" shall be determined by generally accepted accounting principles.

[ 1994 c 92 s 364; 1985 c 56 s 23; 1981 c 85 s 43.]